New Jersey, session 221, A2528.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, student-athlete means a college student who participates in an intercollegiate athletic program of a public institution of higher education. b.    In the event that an athletic program at a public institution of higher education does not renew an athletic scholarship of a student-athlete who suffers an incapacitating injury or illness directly related to his participation in the athletic program, and the institutions medical staff determines that the student-athlete is medically ineligible to participate in intercollegiate athletics, the institution shall provide the student-athlete with a scholarship that is equivalent to the athletic scholarship. c.     The equivalent scholarship provided by the institution pursuant to subsection b. of this section, combined with the total duration of any previous athletic scholarship or scholarships received by the student-athlete, shall be provided for a total of five academic years or until the student-athlete completes his undergraduate degree, whichever period is shorter. An institution may, at its discretion, provide an equivalent scholarship for additional academic years. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.